Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-438
Accreditation or certification; when accepted.

(1) The department may accept accreditation or certification by a recognized independent accreditation body or public agency, which has standards that are at least as stringent as those of the State of Nebraska, as evidence that the health care facility or health care service complies with the rules, regulations, and standards adopted and promulgated under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act.

(2) A facility or service licensed pursuant to an accreditation or certification accepted by the department shall notify the department if such accreditation or certification has been sanctioned, modified, terminated, or withdrawn. After giving such notice, the facility or service may continue to operate unless the department determines that the facility or service no longer meets the qualifications for licensure under the act.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 38;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 44.